MiKTeX/default/texmflocal/hunspell/dicts/ruen_RUGB.aff
# Affix file for British English MySpell dictionary
# Also suitable as basis for Commonwealth and European English.
# Built from scratch for MySpell. Released under LGPL.
#
# David Bartlett, Andrew Brown.
# R 1.14, 15/12/02
SET UTF-8
TRY esiaénrtolcdugmphbyfvkw-'.zqjxSNRTLCGDMPHBEAUYOFIVKWöâôZQJXÅçèîêàïüäñоаитенрсвйлпкьыяудмзшбчгщюжцёхфэъАВСМКГПТЕИЛФНДОЭРЗЮЯБХЖШЦУЧЬЫЪЩЙЁ 
REP 24
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP f gh
REP f ugh
REP gh f
REP ff ugh
REP uf ough
REP uff ough
REP k ch
REP ch k
REP dg j
REP j dg
REP w ugh
REP ness ity
REP leness ility
REP ness ivity
REP eness ity
REP og ogue
REP ck qu
REP ck que
REP eg e.g.
REP ie i.e.
REP t ght
REP ght t
PFX A Y 2
PFX A 0 re [^e] 
PFX A 0 re- e 
PFX a Y 1
PFX a 0 mis . 
PFX I Y 4
PFX I 0 il l 
PFX I 0 ir r 
PFX I 0 im [bmp] 
PFX I 0 in [^blmpr] 
PFX c Y 1
PFX c 0 over . 
PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 un . 
PFX C Y 2
PFX C 0 de [^e] 
PFX C 0 de- e 
PFX E Y 1
PFX E 0 dis . 
PFX F Y 5
PFX F 0 com [bmp]
PFX F 0 co [aeiouh]
PFX F 0 cor r
PFX F 0 col l
PFX F 0 con [^abehilmopru]. 
PFX K Y 1
PFX K 0 pre . 
PFX e Y 1
PFX e 0 out . 
PFX f Y 2
PFX f 0 under [^r] 
PFX f 0 under- r 
PFX O Y 1
PFX O 0 non- . 
PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4 0 trans . 
SFX V Y 15
SFX V 0 tive [aio] 
SFX V b ptive b 
SFX V d sive d 
SFX V be ptive be 
SFX V e tive ce 
SFX V de sive de 
SFX V ke cative ke 
SFX V e ptive me 
SFX V e ive [st]e 
SFX V e ative [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX V 0 lative [aeiou]l 
SFX V 0 ative [^aeiou]l 
SFX V 0 ive [st] 
SFX V y icative y 
SFX V 0 ative [^abdeilosty] 
SFX v Y 15
SFX v 0 tively [aio] 
SFX v b ptively b 
SFX v d sively d 
SFX v be ptively be 
SFX v e tively ce 
SFX v de sively de 
SFX v ke catively ke 
SFX v e ptively me 
SFX v e ively [st]e 
SFX v e atively [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX v 0 latively [aeiou]l 
SFX v 0 atively [^aeiou]l 
SFX v 0 ively [st] 
SFX v y icatively y 
SFX v 0 atively [^abdeilosty] 
SFX u Y 15
SFX u 0 tiveness [aio] 
SFX u b ptiveness b 
SFX u d siveness d 
SFX u be ptiveness be 
SFX u e tiveness ce 
SFX u de siveness de 
SFX u ke cativeness ke 
SFX u e ptiveness me 
SFX u e iveness [st]e 
SFX u e ativeness [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX u 0 lativeness [aeiou]l 
SFX u 0 ativeness [^aeiou]l 
SFX u 0 iveness [st] 
SFX u y icativeness y 
SFX u 0 ativeness [^abdeilosty] 
SFX N Y 26
SFX N b ption b 
SFX N d sion d 
SFX N be ption be 
SFX N e tion ce 
SFX N de sion de 
SFX N ke cation ke 
SFX N e ption ume 
SFX N e mation [^u]me 
SFX N e ion [^o]se 
SFX N e ition ose 
SFX N e ation [iou]te 
SFX N e ion [^iou]te 
SFX N e ation [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX N el ulsion el 
SFX N 0 lation [aiou]l 
SFX N 0 ation [^aeiou]l 
SFX N 0 mation [aeiou]m 
SFX N 0 ation [^aeiou]m 
SFX N er ration er 
SFX N 0 ation [^e]r 
SFX N 0 ion [sx] 
SFX N t ssion mit 
SFX N 0 ion [^m]it 
SFX N 0 ation [^i]t 
SFX N y ication y 
SFX N 0 ation [^bdelmrstxy] 
SFX n Y 28
SFX n 0 tion a 
SFX n e tion ce 
SFX n ke cation ke 
SFX n e ation [iou]te 
SFX n e ion [^iou]te 
SFX n e ation [^ckt]e 
SFX n el ulsion el 
SFX n 0 lation [aiou]l 
SFX n 0 ation [^aeiou]l 
SFX n er ration er 
SFX n 0 ation [^e]r 
SFX n y ation py 
SFX n y ication [^p]y 
SFX n 0 ation [^aelry] 
SFX n 0 tions a 
SFX n e tions ce 
SFX n ke cations ke 
SFX n e ations [iou]te 
SFX n e ions [^iou]te 
SFX n e ations [^ckt]e 
SFX n el ulsions el 
SFX n 0 lations [aiou]l 
SFX n 0 ations [^aeiou]l 
SFX n er rations er 
SFX n 0 ations [^e]r 
SFX n y ations py 
SFX n y ications [^p]y 
SFX n 0 ations [^aelry] 
SFX X Y 26
SFX X b ptions b 
SFX X d sions d 
SFX X be ptions be 
SFX X e tions ce 
SFX X ke cations ke 
SFX X de sions de 
SFX X e ptions ume 
SFX X e mations [^u]me 
SFX X e ions [^o]se 
SFX X e itions ose 
SFX X e ations [iou]te 
SFX X e ions [^iou]te 
SFX X e ations [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX X el ulsions el 
SFX X 0 lations [aiou]l 
SFX X 0 ations [^aeiou]l 
SFX X 0 mations [aeiou]m 
SFX X 0 ations [^aeiou]m 
SFX X er rations er 
SFX X 0 ations [^e]r 
SFX X 0 ions [sx] 
SFX X t ssions mit 
SFX X 0 ions [^m]it 
SFX X 0 ations [^i]t 
SFX X y ications y 
SFX X 0 ations [^bdelmrstxy] 
SFX x Y 40
SFX x b ptional b 
SFX x d sional d 
SFX x be ptional be 
SFX x e tional ce 
SFX x ke cational ke 
SFX x de sional de 
SFX x e ional [^o]se 
SFX x e itional ose 
SFX x e ional te 
SFX x e ational [^bcdkst]e 
SFX x el ulsional el 
SFX x 0 lational [aiou]l 
SFX x 0 ational [^aeiou]l 
SFX x er rational er 
SFX x 0 ational [^e]r 
SFX x 0 ional [sx] 
SFX x 0 ional [^n]t 
SFX x 0 ational nt 
SFX x y icational y 
SFX x 0 ational [^bdelrstxy] 
SFX x b ptionally b 
SFX x d sionally d 
SFX x be ptionally be 
SFX x e tionally ce 
SFX x ke cationally ke 
SFX x de sionally de 
SFX x e ionally [^o]se 
SFX x e itionally ose 
SFX x e ionally te 
SFX x e ationally [^bcdkst]e 
SFX x el ulsionally el 
SFX x 0 lationally [aiou]l 
SFX x 0 ationally [^aeiou]l 
SFX x er rationally er 
SFX x 0 ationally [^e]r 
SFX x 0 ionally [sx] 
SFX x 0 ionally [^n]t 
SFX x 0 ationally nt 
SFX x y icationally y 
SFX x 0 ationally [^bdelrstxy] 
SFX H N 13
SFX H y ieth y 
SFX H ree ird ree 
SFX H ve fth ve 
SFX H e th [^ev]e 
SFX H 0 h t 
SFX H 0 th [^ety] 
SFX H y ieths y 
SFX H ree irds ree 
SFX H ve fths ve 
SFX H e ths [^ev]e 
SFX H 0 hs t 
SFX H 0 ths [^ety] 
SFX H 0 fold . 
SFX Y Y 9
SFX Y 0 ally ic 
SFX Y 0 ly [^i]c 
SFX Y e y [^aeiou]le 
SFX Y 0 ly [aeiou]le 
SFX Y 0 ly [^l]e 
SFX Y 0 y [^aeiou]l 
SFX Y y ily [^aeiou]y 
SFX Y 0 ly [aeiou][ly] 
SFX Y 0 ly [^cely] 
SFX G Y 24
SFX G e ing [^eioy]e 
SFX G 0 ing [eoy]e 
SFX G ie ying ie 
SFX G 0 bing [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX G 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX G 0 ding [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX G 0 fing [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX G 0 ging [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX G 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX G 0 ling [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX G 0 ing [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX G 0 ling [^aeo]al 
SFX G 0 ing [aeo]al 
SFX G 0 ming [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX G 0 ning [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX G 0 ping [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX G 0 ring [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX G 0 sing [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX G 0 ting [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX G 0 ving [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX G 0 zing [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX G 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX G 0 ing [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX G 0 ing [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX J Y 25
SFX J e ings [^eioy]e 
SFX J 0 ings [eoy]e 
SFX J ie yings ie 
SFX J 0 bings [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX J 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX J 0 dings [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX J 0 fings [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX J 0 gings [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX J 0 kings [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX J 0 lings [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX J 0 ings [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX J 0 lings [^aeo]al 
SFX J 0 ings [aeo]al 
SFX J 0 mings [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX J 0 nings [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX J 0 pings [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX J 0 rings [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX J 0 sings [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX J 0 tings [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX J 0 vings [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX J 0 zings [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX J 0 ings [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX J 0 ings [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX J 0 ings [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX J 0 ings [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX k Y 8
SFX k e ingly [^eioy]e 
SFX k 0 ingly [eoy]e 
SFX k ie yingly ie 
SFX k 0 kingly [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX k 0 lingly [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX k 0 ingly [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX k 0 ingly [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX k 0 ingly [^ecl] 
SFX D Y 25
SFX D 0 d [^e]e 
SFX D e d ee 
SFX D 0 bed [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX D 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX D 0 ded [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX D 0 fed [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX D 0 ged [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX D 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX D 0 led [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX D 0 ed [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX D 0 led [^aeo]al 
SFX D 0 ed [aeo]al 
SFX D 0 med [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX D 0 ned [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX D 0 ped [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX D 0 red [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX D 0 sed [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX D 0 ted [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX D 0 ved [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX D 0 zed [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX D y ied [^aeiou]y 
SFX D 0 ed [aeiou]y 
SFX D 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX D 0 ed [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX D 0 ed [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
